Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5780.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 373. (1) A domestic credit union may convert into a mutual savings bank or mutual savings association if all of the following are met: (a) At least 30 days before voting on a plan of conversion under subdivision (b), the credit union board gives written notice to the credit union's members that it is considering a conversion. The credit union board shall mail the notice to the credit union's members and shall not include any other mailing with the notice. The notice shall must include all of the following: (i) A brief statement of why the credit union board is considering the conversion. (ii) A brief statement of the major positive and negative effects of the proposed conversion. (iii) A request for members' written comments on the proposed conversion. (b) The credit union board approves of a plan of conversion and files the plan of conversion with the commissioner. director. An affirmative vote of 2/3 of the entire credit union board is required to approve a plan of conversion. The plan of conversion shall must meet all of the following: (i) The conversion plan of conversion discloses to the members information concerning the advantages and disadvantages of the proposed conversion and contains a statement indicating any material differences in powers between a credit union and a mutual savings bank or mutual savings association. (ii) The conversion is not intended to circumvent a pending supervisory action initiated by the commissioner director or another regulatory agency because of a concern over the safety and soundness of the credit union. (iii) The conversion plan of conversion does not provide any official of the converting credit union with any remuneration or other economic benefit in connection with the conversion. (iv) After conversion, the mutual savings bank or mutual savings association is likely to be economically viable. (c) The credit union board shall call a special meeting of the members to vote on the conversion plan of conversion and mail to each member notice of the meeting and proposed conversion 90 days before the date of the special meeting. The notice shall must include all of the following: (i) A summary of the positive and negative effects of the proposed conversion. (ii) A statement that the officials will not receive any remuneration or other economic benefit in connection with the conversion of the domestic credit union. (iii) A statement that any interested person may obtain more detailed information about the conversion from the domestic credit union at its principal place of business, or by any method approved in advance by the commissioner.director. (iv) A statement that the credit union board may substantively amend the proposed plan of conversion before the special meeting based on comments from regulatory authorities or any other reason and that the credit union board may terminate the proposed plan of conversion. (v) Instructions for obtaining a copy of the conversion plan of conversion. (vi) The date of the special meeting and a statement that the vote on the conversion will close on that date. (vii) Any other information required by the commissioner.director. (d) At least 60 days before the special meeting described in subdivision (c), the credit union board posts a copy of the notice required in subdivision (c) in each branch, service center, or other location in this state where members may transact business with the credit union, in at least 12-point type, displayed prominently in an area visible to members before they transact business. (e) At least 60 days before the special meeting described in subdivision (c), if the credit union conducts any member transactions through the use of an internet website, the credit union board displays the information included in the notice required in subdivision (c) in a conspicuous location on that website. (f) Thirty days before the special meeting of the members, the credit union board mails a notice of the meeting and proposed conversion. The notice shall must include all of the information described in subdivision (c) for the 90-day notice and shall must include the date, time, and place of the special member meeting, a ballot and postage-paid return envelope, and a summary of the methods permitted for casting votes. (g) If the plan of conversion is substantively amended by the credit union board, at least 30 days before the vote of the members on the plan of conversion, the credit union board shall mail a notice to each member. The notice shall must contain the information concerning the amended plan of conversion described in subdivision (c) for a notice under that subdivision. (h) At a special meeting of members, the members, by a 2/3 vote of members voting, approve of the conversion and the plan of conversion. A member may vote in person or by mail. With the prior approval of the commissioner, director, a domestic credit union may accept member votes by an alternative method that is reasonably calculated to ensure each member has an opportunity to vote. (i) The domestic credit union files with the commissioner director all of the following: (i) Certified copies of records of all proceedings held by the credit union board and members of the domestic credit union. (ii) Copies of member comments submitted to the domestic credit union under subdivision (a)(iii). (iii) If that consent or approval is required, a certified copy of the consent or approval of any state or federal regulatory authority with jurisdiction over the mutual savings bank or mutual savings association after the conversion and, if a holding company is to be formed in connection with the conversion, the regulations of the federal reserve board of governors Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or of the office of thrift supervision Office of Thrift Supervision applicable to holding companies. (iv) Verification that deposits in the converted mutual savings bank or mutual savings association qualify for federal insurance from a federal agency authorized to insure share and deposit accounts or from a qualified private insurance organization as that term is defined in section 387. (2) If the requirements of this section are met and the commissioner director determines that the notices to members were accurate, timely, and not misleading, and that conduct of the vote on the conversion plan of conversion was fair and lawful, the commissioner director shall approve the conversion and the conversion is effective. (3) Except as otherwise required by the commissioner, director, this section does not apply to a domestic credit union that submitted to the commissioner director a plan of conversion into a mutual savings bank or mutual savings association before the effective date of this act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05525'25) or House Bill No. 5779 (request no. H05525'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05544'25) or House Bill No. 5782 (request no. H05544'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05545'25) or House Bill No. 5781 (request no. H05545'25). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06228'26) or House Bill No. 5783 (request no. H06228'26).